Massachusetts, session 194th, S2312.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the
following new section:-
Section 142P. There shall be at least one Air Monitoring Station within a one-mile radius
of any working natural gas compressor station to collect data and verify compliance with the
National Ambient Air Quality Standards. Construction and maintenance of Air Monitoring
Stations shall be funded through the building permit paid for by the operating energy corporation
to the state Department of Environmental Protection. Personnel shall be staffed through the state
Department of Environmental Protection to collect data on a weekly basis, varying between
morning and evening collection times.
of 1